Maryland, session 2026, HB0886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(P) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–864 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE SAME MANNER THEY APPLY TO CARRIERS.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for the
delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in accordance
with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR SERVICES PROVIDED BY CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY SPECIALISTS
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–864 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 886 3
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
SERVICES PROVIDED IN ANY SETTING BY A CERTIFIED PEER RECOVERY SPECIALIST
WHO IS CERTIFIED BY THE MARYLAND ADDICTION AND BEHAVIORAL–HEALTH
PROFESSIONALS CERTIFICATION BOARD OR A SUCCESSOR ENTITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Health shall:
(1) convene a workgroup with the Maryland Addiction &
Behavioral–Health Professionals Certification Board and interested stakeholders to
identify ways to make the process of certifying peer recovery specialists more efficient,
including through reciprocity; and
(2) report to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on its findings
and whether legislation is needed.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.